Utah statutes.
32A-4a-501.   Enforcement of qualifications for a resort license or
sublicense.
(1)  The commission or department may not take an action described in
Subsection (2) with regard to a resort license unless the person who is found
not to meet the qualifications of Section 32A-4a-203 is one of the following
who is engaged in the management of the resort:
(a)  a partner;
(b)  a managing agent;
(c)  a manager;
(d)  an officer;
(e)  a director;
(f)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the applicant corporation;
(g)  a member who owns at least 20% of the applicant limited liability
company; or
(h)  a person employed to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for the
resort licensee.
(2)  Subsection (1) applies to:
(a)  the commission immediately suspending or revoking a resort license, if
after the day on which the resort license is granted, a person described in
Subsection 32A-4a-203(1)(a), (b), or (c):
(i)  is found to have been convicted of an offense described in Subsection
32A-4a-203(1)(a) before the resort license is granted; or
(ii)  on or after the day on which the resort license is granted:
(A)  is convicted of an offense described in Subsection 32A-4a-203(1)(a)(i),
(ii), or (iii); or
(B) (I)  is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or
the combined influence of alcohol and a drug; and
(II)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and a drug within five years before the day on
which the person is convicted of the offense described in Subsection 32A-
4a-203(2)(b)(ii)(A);
(b)  the director taking an emergency action by immediately suspending the
operation of a resort license in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, for the period during which the criminal matter
is being adjudicated if a person described in Subsection 32A-4a-203(1)(a),
(b), or (c):
(i)  is arrested on a charge for an offense described in Subsection 32A-
4a-203(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii); or
(ii) (A)  is arrested on a charge for the offense of driving under the
influence of alcohol, a drug, or the combined influence of alcohol and a drug;
and
(B)  was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol, a drug, or the
combined influence of alcohol and a drug within five years before the day on
which the person is arrested on a charge described in Subsection (2)(b)(i);
and
(c)  the commission suspending or revoking a resort license because a person
to whom a resort license is granted under this chapter no longer possesses the
qualifications required by this title for obtaining the resort license.
(3)  This section does not prevent the commission from suspending or revoking
a sublicense that is part of a resort license if a person employed to act in a
supervisory or managerial capacity for a sublicense no longer meets the
qualification requirements in the provisions applicable to the sublicense.
